lib/vendor/Text_TeXHyphen/hyph_bg_BG.tex
4ןב4
4פג4
4עה4
4סח4
4רז4
4ךד4
4בן4
4גפ4
4הע4
4חס4
4זר4
4דך4
4צק4
4קצ4
ה4ז
ה4ח
.םא4ה5ח
.םא4ה5ז
.ןמ4ה5ח
.ןמ4ה5ז
.ןנו4ה5ח
.ןנו4ה5ז
.םא5ה6זאג
.םא5ה6זאס
.ןמ5ה6זאג
.ןמ5ה6זףנ
8ü8
א1
ת1
מ1
ף1
ו1
ט1
‏1
ÿ1
ב1
ג1
ד1
ה1
ז1
ח1
ך1
כ1
ל1
ם1
ן1
נ1
ס1
ע1
פ1
ץ1
צ1
ק1
ר1
ש1
י1בא
י1בת
י1במ
י1בף
י1בו
י1בט
י1ב‏
י1בÿ
י1גא
י1גת
י1גמ
י1גף
י1גו
י1גט
י1ג‏
י1גÿ
י1דא
י1דת
י1דמ
י1דף
י1דו
י1דט
י1ד‏
י1דÿ
י1הא
י1הת
י1המ
י1הף
י1הו
י1הט
י1ה‏
י1הÿ
י1זא
י1זת
י1זמ
י1זף
י1זו
י1זט
י1ז‏
י1זÿ
י1חא
י1חת
י1חמ
י1חף
י1חו
י1חט
י1ח‏
י1חÿ
י1יא
י1ית
י1ימ
י1יף
י1יו
י1יט
י1י‏
י1יÿ
י1ךא
י1ךת
י1ךמ
י1ךף
י1ךו
י1ךט
י1ך‏
י1ךÿ
י1כא
י1כת
י1כמ
י1כף
י1כו
י1כט
י1כ‏
י1כÿ
י1לא
י1לת
י1למ
י1לף
י1לו
י1לט
י1ל‏
י1לÿ
י1םא
י1םת
י1םמ
י1םף
י1םו
י1םט
י1ם‏
י1םÿ
י1ןא
י1ןת
י1ןמ
י1ןף
י1ןו
י1ןט
י1ן‏
י1ןÿ
י1נא
י1נת
י1נמ
י1נף
י1נו
י1נט
י1נ‏
י1נÿ
י1סא
י1סת
י1סמ
י1סף
י1סו
י1סט
י1ס‏
י1סÿ
י1עא
י1עת
י1עמ
י1עף
י1עו
י1עט
י1ע‏
י1עÿ
י1פא
י1פת
י1פמ
י1פף
י1פו
י1פט
י1פ‏
י1פÿ
י1ץא
י1ץת
י1ץמ
י1ץף
י1ץו
י1ץט
י1ץ‏
י1ץÿ
י1צא
י1צת
י1צמ
י1צף
י1צו
י1צט
י1צ‏
י1צÿ
י1קא
י1קת
י1קמ
י1קף
י1קו
י1קט
י1ק‏
י1קÿ
י1רא
י1רת
י1רמ
י1רף
י1רו
י1רט
י1ר‏
י1רÿ
י1שא
י1שת
י1שמ
י1שף
י1שו
י1שט
י1ש‏
י1שÿ
ב2א
ב2ת
ב2מ
ב2ף
ב2ו
ב2ט
ב2‏
ב2ÿ
ג2א
ג2ת
ג2מ
ג2ף
ג2ו
ג2ט
ג2‏
ג2ÿ
ד2א
ד2ת
ד2מ
ד2ף
ד2ו
ד2ט
ד2‏
ד2ÿ
ה2א
ה2ת
ה2מ
ה2ף
ה2ו
ה2ט
ה2‏
ה2ÿ
ז2א
ז2ת
ז2מ
ז2ף
ז2ו
ז2ט
ז2‏
ז2ÿ
ח2א
ח2ת
ח2מ
ח2ף
ח2ו
ח2ט
ח2‏
ח2ÿ
י2א
י2ת
י2מ
י2ף
י2ו
י2ט
י2‏
י2ÿ
ך2א
ך2ת
ך2מ
ך2ף
ך2ו
ך2ט
ך2‏
ך2ÿ
כ2א
כ2ת
כ2מ
כ2ף
כ2ו
כ2ט
כ2‏
כ2ÿ
ל2א
ל2ת
ל2מ
ל2ף
ל2ו
ל2ט
ל2‏
ל2ÿ
ם2א
ם2ת
ם2מ
ם2ף
ם2ו
ם2ט
ם2‏
ם2ÿ
ן2א
ן2ת
ן2מ
ן2ף
ן2ו
ן2ט
ן2‏
ן2ÿ
נ2א
נ2ת
נ2מ
נ2ף
נ2ו
נ2ט
נ2‏
נ2ÿ
ס2א
ס2ת
ס2מ
ס2ף
ס2ו
ס2ט
ס2‏
ס2ÿ
ע2א
ע2ת
ע2מ
ע2ף
ע2ו
ע2ט
ע2‏
ע2ÿ
פ2א
פ2ת
פ2מ
פ2ף
פ2ו
פ2ט
פ2‏
פ2ÿ
ץ2א
ץ2ת
ץ2מ
ץ2ף
ץ2ו
ץ2ט
ץ2‏
ץ2ÿ
צ2א
צ2ת
צ2מ
צ2ף
צ2ו
צ2ט
צ2‏
צ2ÿ
ק2א
ק2ת
ק2מ
ק2ף
ק2ו
ק2ט
ק2‏
ק2ÿ
ר2א
ר2ת
ר2מ
ר2ף
ר2ו
ר2ט
ר2‏
ר2ÿ
ש2א
ש2ת
ש2מ
ש2ף
ש2ו
ש2ט
ש2‏
ש2ÿ
א2ב
א3בü
א3בא
א3בת
א3במ
א3בף
א3בו
א3בט
א3ב‏
א3בÿ
ת2ב
ת3בü
ת3בא
ת3בת
ת3במ
ת3בף
ת3בו
ת3בט
ת3ב‏
ת3בÿ
מ2ב
מ3בü
מ3בא
מ3בת
מ3במ
מ3בף
מ3בו
מ3בט
מ3ב‏
מ3בÿ
ף2ב
ף3בü
ף3בא
ף3בת
ף3במ
ף3בף
ף3בו
ף3בט
ף3ב‏
ף3בÿ
ו2ב
ו3בü
ו3בא
ו3בת
ו3במ
ו3בף
ו3בו
ו3בט
ו3ב‏
ו3בÿ
ט2ב
ט3בü
ט3בא
ט3בת
ט3במ
ט3בף
ט3בו
ט3בט
ט3ב‏
ט3בÿ
‏2ב
‏3בü
‏3בא
‏3בת
‏3במ
‏3בף
‏3בו
‏3בט
‏3ב‏
‏3בÿ
ÿ2ב
ÿ3בü
ÿ3בא
ÿ3בת
ÿ3במ
ÿ3בף
ÿ3בו
ÿ3בט
ÿ3ב‏
ÿ3בÿ
א2ג
א3גü
א3גא
א3גת
א3גמ
א3גף
א3גו
א3גט
א3ג‏
א3גÿ
ת2ג
ת3גü
ת3גא
ת3גת
ת3גמ
ת3גף
ת3גו
ת3גט
ת3ג‏
ת3גÿ
מ2ג
מ3גü
מ3גא
מ3גת
מ3גמ
מ3גף
מ3גו
מ3גט
מ3ג‏
מ3גÿ
ף2ג
ף3גü
ף3גא
ף3גת
ף3גמ
ף3גף
ף3גו
ף3גט
ף3ג‏
ף3גÿ
ו2ג
ו3גü
ו3גא
ו3גת
ו3גמ
ו3גף
ו3גו
ו3גט
ו3ג‏
ו3גÿ
ט2ג
ט3גü
ט3גא
ט3גת
ט3גמ
ט3גף
ט3גו
ט3גט
ט3ג‏
ט3גÿ
‏2ג
‏3גü
‏3גא
‏3גת
‏3גמ
‏3גף
‏3גו
‏3גט
‏3ג‏
‏3גÿ
ÿ2ג
ÿ3גü
ÿ3גא
ÿ3גת
ÿ3גמ
ÿ3גף
ÿ3גו
ÿ3גט
ÿ3ג‏
ÿ3גÿ
א2ד
א3דü
א3דא
א3דת
א3דמ
א3דף
א3דו
א3דט
א3ד‏
א3דÿ
ת2ד
ת3דü
ת3דא
ת3דת
ת3דמ
ת3דף
ת3דו
ת3דט
ת3ד‏
ת3דÿ
מ2ד
מ3דü
מ3דא
מ3דת
מ3דמ
מ3דף
מ3דו
מ3דט
מ3ד‏
מ3דÿ
ף2ד
ף3דü
ף3דא
ף3דת
ף3דמ
ף3דף
ף3דו
ף3דט
ף3ד‏
ף3דÿ
ו2ד
ו3דü
ו3דא
ו3דת
ו3דמ
ו3דף
ו3דו
ו3דט
ו3ד‏
ו3דÿ
ט2ד
ט3דü
ט3דא
ט3דת
ט3דמ
ט3דף
ט3דו
ט3דט
ט3ד‏
ט3דÿ
‏2ד
‏3דü
‏3דא
‏3דת
‏3דמ
‏3דף
‏3דו
‏3דט
‏3ד‏
‏3דÿ
ÿ2ד
ÿ3דü
ÿ3דא
ÿ3דת
ÿ3דמ
ÿ3דף
ÿ3דו
ÿ3דט
ÿ3ד‏
ÿ3דÿ
א2ה
א3הü
א3הא
א3הת
א3המ
א3הף
א3הו
א3הט
א3ה‏
א3הÿ
ת2ה
ת3הü
ת3הא
ת3הת
ת3המ
ת3הף
ת3הו
ת3הט
ת3ה‏
ת3הÿ
מ2ה
מ3הü
מ3הא
מ3הת
מ3המ
מ3הף
מ3הו
מ3הט
מ3ה‏
מ3הÿ
ף2ה
ף3הü
ף3הא
ף3הת
ף3המ
ף3הף
ף3הו
ף3הט
ף3ה‏
ף3הÿ
ו2ה
ו3הü
ו3הא
ו3הת
ו3המ
ו3הף
ו3הו
ו3הט
ו3ה‏
ו3הÿ
ט2ה
ט3הü
ט3הא
ט3הת
ט3המ
ט3הף
ט3הו
ט3הט
ט3ה‏
ט3הÿ
‏2ה
‏3הü
‏3הא
‏3הת
‏3המ
‏3הף
‏3הו
‏3הט
‏3ה‏
‏3הÿ
ÿ2ה
ÿ3הü
ÿ3הא
ÿ3הת
ÿ3המ
ÿ3הף
ÿ3הו
ÿ3הט
ÿ3ה‏
ÿ3הÿ
א2ז
א3זü
א3זא
א3זת
א3זמ
א3זף
א3זו
א3זט
א3ז‏
א3זÿ
ת2ז
ת3זü
ת3זא
ת3זת
ת3זמ
ת3זף
ת3זו
ת3זט
ת3ז‏
ת3זÿ
מ2ז
מ3זü
מ3זא
מ3זת
מ3זמ
מ3זף
מ3זו
מ3זט
מ3ז‏
מ3זÿ
ף2ז
ף3זü
ף3זא
ף3זת
ף3זמ
ף3זף
ף3זו
ף3זט
ף3ז‏
ף3זÿ
ו2ז
ו3זü
ו3זא
ו3זת
ו3זמ
ו3זף
ו3זו
ו3זט
ו3ז‏
ו3זÿ
ט2ז
ט3זü
ט3זא
ט3זת
ט3זמ
ט3זף
ט3זו
ט3זט
ט3ז‏
ט3זÿ
‏2ז
‏3זü
‏3זא
‏3זת
‏3זמ
‏3זף
‏3זו
‏3זט
‏3ז‏
‏3זÿ
ÿ2ז
ÿ3זü
ÿ3זא
ÿ3זת
ÿ3זמ
ÿ3זף
ÿ3זו
ÿ3זט
ÿ3ז‏
ÿ3זÿ
א2ח
א3חü
א3חא
א3חת
א3חמ
א3חף
א3חו
א3חט
א3ח‏
א3חÿ
ת2ח
ת3חü
ת3חא
ת3חת
ת3חמ
ת3חף
ת3חו
ת3חט
ת3ח‏
ת3חÿ
מ2ח
מ3חü
מ3חא
מ3חת
מ3חמ
מ3חף
מ3חו
מ3חט
מ3ח‏
מ3חÿ
ף2ח
ף3חü
ף3חא
ף3חת
ף3חמ
ף3חף
ף3חו
ף3חט
ף3ח‏
ף3חÿ
ו2ח
ו3חü
ו3חא
ו3חת
ו3חמ
ו3חף
ו3חו
ו3חט
ו3ח‏
ו3חÿ
ט2ח
ט3חü
ט3חא
ט3חת
ט3חמ
ט3חף
ט3חו
ט3חט
ט3ח‏
ט3חÿ
‏2ח
‏3חü
‏3חא
‏3חת
‏3חמ
‏3חף
‏3חו
‏3חט
‏3ח‏
‏3חÿ
ÿ2ח
ÿ3חü
ÿ3חא
ÿ3חת
ÿ3חמ
ÿ3חף
ÿ3חו
ÿ3חט
ÿ3ח‏
ÿ3חÿ
א2י
א3יü
א3יא
א3ית
א3ימ
א3יף
א3יו
א3יט
א3י‏
א3יÿ
ת2י
ת3יü
ת3יא
ת3ית
ת3ימ
ת3יף
ת3יו
ת3יט
ת3י‏
ת3יÿ
מ2י
מ3יü
מ3יא
מ3ית
מ3ימ
מ3יף
מ3יו
מ3יט
מ3י‏
מ3יÿ
ף2י
ף3יü
ף3יא
ף3ית
ף3ימ
ף3יף
ף3יו
ף3יט
ף3י‏
ף3יÿ
ו2י
ו3יü
ו3יא
ו3ית
ו3ימ
ו3יף
ו3יו
ו3יט
ו3י‏
ו3יÿ
ט2י
ט3יü
ט3יא
ט3ית
ט3ימ
ט3יף
ט3יו
ט3יט
ט3י‏
ט3יÿ
‏2י
‏3יü
‏3יא
‏3ית
‏3ימ
‏3יף
‏3יו
‏3יט
‏3י‏
‏3יÿ
ÿ2י
ÿ3יü
ÿ3יא
ÿ3ית
ÿ3ימ
ÿ3יף
ÿ3יו
ÿ3יט
ÿ3י‏
ÿ3יÿ
א2ך
א3ךü
א3ךא
א3ךת
א3ךמ
א3ךף
א3ךו
א3ךט
א3ך‏
א3ךÿ
ת2ך
ת3ךü
ת3ךא
ת3ךת
ת3ךמ
ת3ךף
ת3ךו
ת3ךט
ת3ך‏
ת3ךÿ
מ2ך
מ3ךü
מ3ךא
מ3ךת
מ3ךמ
מ3ךף
מ3ךו
מ3ךט
מ3ך‏
מ3ךÿ
ף2ך
ף3ךü
ף3ךא
ף3ךת
ף3ךמ
ף3ךף
ף3ךו
ף3ךט
ף3ך‏
ף3ךÿ
ו2ך
ו3ךü
ו3ךא
ו3ךת
ו3ךמ
ו3ךף
ו3ךו
ו3ךט
ו3ך‏
ו3ךÿ
ט2ך
ט3ךü
ט3ךא
ט3ךת
ט3ךמ
ט3ךף
ט3ךו
ט3ךט
ט3ך‏
ט3ךÿ
‏2ך
‏3ךü
‏3ךא
‏3ךת
‏3ךמ
‏3ךף
‏3ךו
‏3ךט
‏3ך‏
‏3ךÿ
ÿ2ך
ÿ3ךü
ÿ3ךא
ÿ3ךת
ÿ3ךמ
ÿ3ךף
ÿ3ךו
ÿ3ךט
ÿ3ך‏
ÿ3ךÿ
א2כ
א3כü
א3כא
א3כת
א3כמ
א3כף
א3כו
א3כט
א3כ‏
א3כÿ
ת2כ
ת3כü
ת3כא
ת3כת
ת3כמ
ת3כף
ת3כו
ת3כט
ת3כ‏
ת3כÿ
מ2כ
מ3כü
מ3כא
מ3כת
מ3כמ
מ3כף
מ3כו
מ3כט
מ3כ‏
מ3כÿ
ף2כ
ף3כü
ף3כא
ף3כת
ף3כמ
ף3כף
ף3כו
ף3כט
ף3כ‏
ף3כÿ
ו2כ
ו3כü
ו3כא
ו3כת
ו3כמ
ו3כף
ו3כו
ו3כט
ו3כ‏
ו3כÿ
ט2כ
ט3כü
ט3כא
ט3כת
ט3כמ
ט3כף
ט3כו
ט3כט
ט3כ‏
ט3כÿ
‏2כ
‏3כü
‏3כא
‏3כת
‏3כמ
‏3כף
‏3כו
‏3כט
‏3כ‏
‏3כÿ
ÿ2כ
ÿ3כü
ÿ3כא
ÿ3כת
ÿ3כמ
ÿ3כף
ÿ3כו
ÿ3כט
ÿ3כ‏
ÿ3כÿ
א2ל
א3לü
א3לא
א3לת
א3למ
א3לף
א3לו
א3לט
א3ל‏
א3לÿ
ת2ל
ת3לü
ת3לא
ת3לת
ת3למ
ת3לף
ת3לו
ת3לט
ת3ל‏
ת3לÿ
מ2ל
מ3לü
מ3לא
מ3לת
מ3למ
מ3לף
מ3לו
מ3לט
מ3ל‏
מ3לÿ
ף2ל
ף3לü
ף3לא
ף3לת
ף3למ
ף3לף
ף3לו
ף3לט
ף3ל‏
ף3לÿ
ו2ל
ו3לü
ו3לא
ו3לת
ו3למ
ו3לף
ו3לו
ו3לט
ו3ל‏
ו3לÿ
ט2ל
ט3לü
ט3לא
ט3לת
ט3למ
ט3לף
ט3לו
ט3לט
ט3ל‏
ט3לÿ
‏2ל
‏3לü
‏3לא
‏3לת
‏3למ
‏3לף
‏3לו
‏3לט
‏3ל‏
‏3לÿ
ÿ2ל
ÿ3לü
ÿ3לא
ÿ3לת
ÿ3למ
ÿ3לף
ÿ3לו
ÿ3לט
ÿ3ל‏
ÿ3לÿ
א2ם
א3םü
א3םא
א3םת
א3םמ
א3םף
א3םו
א3םט
א3ם‏
א3םÿ
ת2ם
ת3םü
ת3םא
ת3םת
ת3םמ
ת3םף
ת3םו
ת3םט
ת3ם‏
ת3םÿ
מ2ם
מ3םü
מ3םא
מ3םת
מ3םמ
מ3םף
מ3םו
מ3םט
מ3ם‏
מ3םÿ
ף2ם
ף3םü
ף3םא
ף3םת
ף3םמ
ף3םף
ף3םו
ף3םט
ף3ם‏
ף3םÿ
ו2ם
ו3םü
ו3םא
ו3םת
ו3םמ
ו3םף
ו3םו
ו3םט
ו3ם‏
ו3םÿ
ט2ם
ט3םü
ט3םא
ט3םת
ט3םמ
ט3םף
ט3םו
ט3םט
ט3ם‏
ט3םÿ
‏2ם
‏3םü
‏3םא
‏3םת
‏3םמ
‏3םף
‏3םו
‏3םט
‏3ם‏
‏3םÿ
ÿ2ם
ÿ3םü
ÿ3םא
ÿ3םת
ÿ3םמ
ÿ3םף
ÿ3םו
ÿ3םט
ÿ3ם‏
ÿ3םÿ
א2ן
א3ןü
א3ןא
א3ןת
א3ןמ
א3ןף
א3ןו
א3ןט
א3ן‏
א3ןÿ
ת2ן
ת3ןü
ת3ןא
ת3ןת
ת3ןמ
ת3ןף
ת3ןו
ת3ןט
ת3ן‏
ת3ןÿ
מ2ן
מ3ןü
מ3ןא
מ3ןת
מ3ןמ
מ3ןף
מ3ןו
מ3ןט
מ3ן‏
מ3ןÿ
ף2ן
ף3ןü
ף3ןא
ף3ןת
ף3ןמ
ף3ןף
ף3ןו
ף3ןט
ף3ן‏
ף3ןÿ
ו2ן
ו3ןü
ו3ןא
ו3ןת
ו3ןמ
ו3ןף
ו3ןו
ו3ןט
ו3ן‏
ו3ןÿ
ט2ן
ט3ןü
ט3ןא
ט3ןת
ט3ןמ
ט3ןף
ט3ןו
ט3ןט
ט3ן‏
ט3ןÿ
‏2ן
‏3ןü
‏3ןא
‏3ןת
‏3ןמ
‏3ןף
‏3ןו
‏3ןט
‏3ן‏
‏3ןÿ
ÿ2ן
ÿ3ןü
ÿ3ןא
ÿ3ןת
ÿ3ןמ
ÿ3ןף
ÿ3ןו
ÿ3ןט
ÿ3ן‏
ÿ3ןÿ
א2נ
א3נü
א3נא
א3נת
א3נמ
א3נף
א3נו
א3נט
א3נ‏
א3נÿ
ת2נ
ת3נü
ת3נא
ת3נת
ת3נמ
ת3נף
ת3נו
ת3נט
ת3נ‏
ת3נÿ
מ2נ
מ3נü
מ3נא
מ3נת
מ3נמ
מ3נף
מ3נו
מ3נט
מ3נ‏
מ3נÿ
ף2נ
ף3נü
ף3נא
ף3נת
ף3נמ
ף3נף
ף3נו
ף3נט
ף3נ‏
ף3נÿ
ו2נ
ו3נü
ו3נא
ו3נת
ו3נמ
ו3נף
ו3נו
ו3נט
ו3נ‏
ו3נÿ
ט2נ
ט3נü
ט3נא
ט3נת
ט3נמ
ט3נף
ט3נו
ט3נט
ט3נ‏
ט3נÿ
‏2נ
‏3נü
‏3נא
‏3נת
‏3נמ
‏3נף
‏3נו
‏3נט
‏3נ‏
‏3נÿ
ÿ2נ
ÿ3נü
ÿ3נא
ÿ3נת
ÿ3נמ
ÿ3נף
ÿ3נו
ÿ3נט
ÿ3נ‏
ÿ3נÿ
א2ס
א3סü
א3סא
א3סת
א3סמ
א3סף
א3סו
א3סט
א3ס‏
א3סÿ
ת2ס
ת3סü
ת3סא
ת3סת
ת3סמ
ת3סף
ת3סו
ת3סט
ת3ס‏
ת3סÿ
מ2ס
מ3סü
מ3סא
מ3סת
מ3סמ
מ3סף
מ3סו
מ3סט
מ3ס‏
מ3סÿ
ף2ס
ף3סü
ף3סא
ף3סת
ף3סמ
ף3סף
ף3סו
ף3סט
ף3ס‏
ף3סÿ
ו2ס
ו3סü
ו3סא
ו3סת
ו3סמ
ו3סף
ו3סו
ו3סט
ו3ס‏
ו3סÿ
ט2ס
ט3סü
ט3סא
ט3סת
ט3סמ
ט3סף
ט3סו
ט3סט
ט3ס‏
ט3סÿ
‏2ס
‏3סü
‏3סא
‏3סת
‏3סמ
‏3סף
‏3סו
‏3סט
‏3ס‏
‏3סÿ
ÿ2ס
ÿ3סü
ÿ3סא
ÿ3סת
ÿ3סמ
ÿ3סף
ÿ3סו
ÿ3סט
ÿ3ס‏
ÿ3סÿ
א2ע
א3עü
א3עא
א3עת
א3עמ
א3עף
א3עו
א3עט
א3ע‏
א3עÿ
ת2ע
ת3עü
ת3עא
ת3עת
ת3עמ
ת3עף
ת3עו
ת3עט
ת3ע‏
ת3עÿ
מ2ע
מ3עü
מ3עא
מ3עת
מ3עמ
מ3עף
מ3עו
מ3עט
מ3ע‏
מ3עÿ
ף2ע
ף3עü
ף3עא
ף3עת
ף3עמ
ף3עף
ף3עו
ף3עט
ף3ע‏
ף3עÿ
ו2ע
ו3עü
ו3עא
ו3עת
ו3עמ
ו3עף
ו3עו
ו3עט
ו3ע‏
ו3עÿ
ט2ע
ט3עü
ט3עא
ט3עת
ט3עמ
ט3עף
ט3עו
ט3עט
ט3ע‏
ט3עÿ
‏2ע
‏3עü
‏3עא
‏3עת
‏3עמ
‏3עף
‏3עו
‏3עט
‏3ע‏
‏3עÿ
ÿ2ע
ÿ3עü
ÿ3עא
ÿ3עת
ÿ3עמ
ÿ3עף
ÿ3עו
ÿ3עט
ÿ3ע‏
ÿ3עÿ
א2פ
א3פü
א3פא
א3פת
א3פמ
א3פף
א3פו
א3פט
א3פ‏
א3פÿ
ת2פ
ת3פü
ת3פא
ת3פת
ת3פמ
ת3פף
ת3פו
ת3פט
ת3פ‏
ת3פÿ
מ2פ
מ3פü
מ3פא
מ3פת
מ3פמ
מ3פף
מ3פו
מ3פט
מ3פ‏
מ3פÿ
ף2פ
ף3פü
ף3פא
ף3פת
ף3פמ
ף3פף
ף3פו
ף3פט
ף3פ‏
ף3פÿ
ו2פ
ו3פü
ו3פא
ו3פת
ו3פמ
ו3פף
ו3פו
ו3פט
ו3פ‏
ו3פÿ
ט2פ
ט3פü
ט3פא
ט3פת
ט3פמ
ט3פף
ט3פו
ט3פט
ט3פ‏
ט3פÿ
‏2פ
‏3פü
‏3פא
‏3פת
‏3פמ
‏3פף
‏3פו
‏3פט
‏3פ‏
‏3פÿ
ÿ2פ
ÿ3פü
ÿ3פא
ÿ3פת
ÿ3פמ
ÿ3פף
ÿ3פו
ÿ3פט
ÿ3פ‏
ÿ3פÿ
א2ץ
א3ץü
א3ץא
א3ץת
א3ץמ
א3ץף
א3ץו
א3ץט
א3ץ‏
א3ץÿ
ת2ץ
ת3ץü
ת3ץא
ת3ץת
ת3ץמ
ת3ץף
ת3ץו
ת3ץט
ת3ץ‏
ת3ץÿ
מ2ץ
מ3ץü
מ3ץא
מ3ץת
מ3ץמ
מ3ץף
מ3ץו
מ3ץט
מ3ץ‏
מ3ץÿ
ף2ץ
ף3ץü
ף3ץא
ף3ץת
ף3ץמ
ף3ץף
ף3ץו
ף3ץט
ף3ץ‏
ף3ץÿ
ו2ץ
ו3ץü
ו3ץא
ו3ץת
ו3ץמ
ו3ץף
ו3ץו
ו3ץט
ו3ץ‏
ו3ץÿ
ט2ץ
ט3ץü
ט3ץא
ט3ץת
ט3ץמ
ט3ץף
ט3ץו
ט3ץט
ט3ץ‏
ט3ץÿ
‏2ץ
‏3ץü
‏3ץא
‏3ץת
‏3ץמ
‏3ץף
‏3ץו
‏3ץט
‏3ץ‏
‏3ץÿ
ÿ2ץ
ÿ3ץü
ÿ3ץא
ÿ3ץת
ÿ3ץמ
ÿ3ץף
ÿ3ץו
ÿ3ץט
ÿ3ץ‏
ÿ3ץÿ
א2צ
א3צü
א3צא
א3צת
א3צמ
א3צף
א3צו
א3צט
א3צ‏
א3צÿ
ת2צ
ת3צü
ת3צא
ת3צת
ת3צמ
ת3צף
ת3צו
ת3צט
ת3צ‏
ת3צÿ
מ2צ
מ3צü
מ3צא
מ3צת
מ3צמ
מ3צף
מ3צו
מ3צט
מ3צ‏
מ3צÿ
ף2צ
ף3צü
ף3צא
ף3צת
ף3צמ
ף3צף
ף3צו
ף3צט
ף3צ‏
ף3צÿ
ו2צ
ו3צü
ו3צא
ו3צת
ו3צמ
ו3צף
ו3צו
ו3צט
ו3צ‏
ו3צÿ
ט2צ
ט3צü
ט3צא
ט3צת
ט3צמ
ט3צף
ט3צו
ט3צט
ט3צ‏
ט3צÿ
‏2צ
‏3צü
‏3צא
‏3צת
‏3צמ
‏3צף
‏3צו
‏3צט
‏3צ‏
‏3צÿ
ÿ2צ
ÿ3צü
ÿ3צא
ÿ3צת
ÿ3צמ
ÿ3צף
ÿ3צו
ÿ3צט
ÿ3צ‏
ÿ3צÿ
א2ק
א3קü
א3קא
א3קת
א3קמ
א3קף
א3קו
א3קט
א3ק‏
א3קÿ
ת2ק
ת3קü
ת3קא
ת3קת
ת3קמ
ת3קף
ת3קו
ת3קט
ת3ק‏
ת3קÿ
מ2ק
מ3קü
מ3קא
מ3קת
מ3קמ
מ3קף
מ3קו
מ3קט
מ3ק‏
מ3קÿ
ף2ק
ף3קü
ף3קא
ף3קת
ף3קמ
ף3קף
ף3קו
ף3קט
ף3ק‏
ף3קÿ
ו2ק
ו3קü
ו3קא
ו3קת
ו3קמ
ו3קף
ו3קו
ו3קט
ו3ק‏
ו3קÿ
ט2ק
ט3קü
ט3קא
ט3קת
ט3קמ
ט3קף
ט3קו
ט3קט
ט3ק‏
ט3קÿ
‏2ק
‏3קü
‏3קא
‏3קת
‏3קמ
‏3קף
‏3קו
‏3קט
‏3ק‏
‏3קÿ
ÿ2ק
ÿ3קü
ÿ3קא
ÿ3קת
ÿ3קמ
ÿ3קף
ÿ3קו
ÿ3קט
ÿ3ק‏
ÿ3קÿ
א2ר
א3רü
א3רא
א3רת
א3רמ
א3רף
א3רו
א3רט
א3ר‏
א3רÿ
ת2ר
ת3רü
ת3רא
ת3רת
ת3רמ
ת3רף
ת3רו
ת3רט
ת3ר‏
ת3רÿ
מ2ר
מ3רü
מ3רא
מ3רת
מ3רמ
מ3רף
מ3רו
מ3רט
מ3ר‏
מ3רÿ
ף2ר
ף3רü
ף3רא
ף3רת
ף3רמ
ף3רף
ף3רו
ף3רט
ף3ר‏
ף3רÿ
ו2ר
ו3רü
ו3רא
ו3רת
ו3רמ
ו3רף
ו3רו
ו3רט
ו3ר‏
ו3רÿ
ט2ר
ט3רü
ט3רא
ט3רת
ט3רמ
ט3רף
ט3רו
ט3רט
ט3ר‏
ט3רÿ
‏2ר
‏3רü
‏3רא
‏3רת
‏3רמ
‏3רף
‏3רו
‏3רט
‏3ר‏
‏3רÿ
ÿ2ר
ÿ3רü
ÿ3רא
ÿ3רת
ÿ3רמ
ÿ3רף
ÿ3רו
ÿ3רט
ÿ3ר‏
ÿ3רÿ
א2ש
א3שü
א3שא
א3שת
א3שמ
א3שף
א3שו
א3שט
א3ש‏
א3שÿ
ת2ש
ת3שü
ת3שא
ת3שת
ת3שמ
ת3שף
ת3שו
ת3שט
ת3ש‏
ת3שÿ
מ2ש
מ3שü
מ3שא
מ3שת
מ3שמ
מ3שף
מ3שו
מ3שט
מ3ש‏
מ3שÿ
ף2ש
ף3שü
ף3שא
ף3שת
ף3שמ
ף3שף
ף3שו
ף3שט
ף3ש‏
ף3שÿ
ו2ש
ו3שü
ו3שא
ו3שת
ו3שמ
ו3שף
ו3שו
ו3שט
ו3ש‏
ו3שÿ
ט2ש
ט3שü
ט3שא
ט3שת
ט3שמ
ט3שף
ט3שו
ט3שט
ט3ש‏
ט3שÿ
‏2ש
‏3שü
‏3שא
‏3שת
‏3שמ
‏3שף
‏3שו
‏3שט
‏3ש‏
‏3שÿ
ÿ2ש
ÿ3שü
ÿ3שא
ÿ3שת
ÿ3שמ
ÿ3שף
ÿ3שו
ÿ3שט
ÿ3ש‏
ÿ3שÿ
א3הזü
א3החü
א3הזא
א3החא
א3הזת
א3החת
א3הזמ
א3החמ
א3הזף
א3החף
א3הזו
א3החו
א3הזט
א3החט
א3הז‏
א3הח‏
א3הזÿ
א3החÿ
ת3הזü
ת3החü
ת3הזא
ת3החא
ת3הזת
ת3החת
ת3הזמ
ת3החמ
ת3הזף
ת3החף
ת3הזו
ת3החו
ת3הזט
ת3החט
ת3הז‏
ת3הח‏
ת3הזÿ
ת3החÿ
מ3הזü
מ3החü
מ3הזא
מ3החא
מ3הזת
מ3החת
מ3הזמ
מ3החמ
מ3הזף
מ3החף
מ3הזו
מ3החו
מ3הזט
מ3החט
מ3הז‏
מ3הח‏
מ3הזÿ
מ3החÿ
ף3הזü
ף3החü
ף3הזא
ף3החא
ף3הזת
ף3החת
ף3הזמ
ף3החמ
ף3הזף
ף3החף
ף3הזו
ף3החו
ף3הזט
ף3החט
ף3הז‏
ף3הח‏
ף3הזÿ
ף3החÿ
ו3הזü
ו3החü
ו3הזא
ו3החא
ו3הזת
ו3החת
ו3הזמ
ו3החמ
ו3הזף
ו3החף
ו3הזו
ו3החו
ו3הזט
ו3החט
ו3הז‏
ו3הח‏
ו3הזÿ
ו3החÿ
ט3הזü
ט3החü
ט3הזא
ט3החא
ט3הזת
ט3החת
ט3הזמ
ט3החמ
ט3הזף
ט3החף
ט3הזו
ט3החו
ט3הזט
ט3החט
ט3הז‏
ט3הח‏
ט3הזÿ
ט3החÿ
‏3הזü
‏3החü
‏3הזא
‏3החא
‏3הזת
‏3החת
‏3הזמ
‏3החמ
‏3הזף
‏3החף
‏3הזו
‏3החו
‏3הזט
‏3החט
‏3הז‏
‏3הח‏
‏3הזÿ
‏3החÿ
ÿ3הזü
ÿ3החü
ÿ3הזא
ÿ3החא
ÿ3הזת
ÿ3החת
ÿ3הזמ
ÿ3החמ
ÿ3הזף
ÿ3החף
ÿ3הזו
ÿ3החו
ÿ3הזט
ÿ3החט
ÿ3הז‏
ÿ3הח‏
ÿ3הזÿ
ÿ3החÿ
אאא4
אאת4
אאמ4
אאף4
אאו4
אאט4
אא‏4
אאÿ4
תאא4
תאת4
תאמ4
תאף4
תאו4
תאט4
תא‏4
תאÿ4
מאא4
מאת4
מאמ4
מאף4
מאו4
מאט4
מא‏4
מאÿ4
ףאא4
ףאת4
ףאמ4
ףאף4
ףאו4
ףאט4
ףא‏4
ףאÿ4
ואא4
ואת4
ואמ4
ואף4
ואו4
ואט4
וא‏4
ואÿ4
טאא4
טאת4
טאמ4
טאף4
טאו4
טאט4
טא‏4
טאÿ4
‏אא4
‏את4
‏אמ4
‏אף4
‏או4
‏אט4
‏א‏4
‏אÿ4
ÿאא4
ÿאת4
ÿאמ4
ÿאף4
ÿאו4
ÿאט4
ÿא‏4
ÿאÿ4
אתא4
אתת4
אתמ4
אתף4
אתו4
אתט4
את‏4
אתÿ4
תתא4
תתת4
תתמ4
תתף4
תתו4
תתט4
תת‏4
תתÿ4
מתא4
מתת4
מתמ4
מתף4
מתו4
מתט4
מת‏4
מתÿ4
ףתא4
ףתת4
ףתמ4
ףתף4
ףתו4
ףתט4
ףת‏4
ףתÿ4
ותא4
ותת4
ותמ4
ותף4
ותו4
ותט4
ות‏4
ותÿ4
טתא4
טתת4
טתמ4
טתף4
טתו4
טתט4
טת‏4
טתÿ4
‏תא4
‏תת4
‏תמ4
‏תף4
‏תו4
‏תט4
‏ת‏4
‏תÿ4
ÿתא4
ÿתת4
ÿתמ4
ÿתף4
ÿתו4
ÿתט4
ÿת‏4
ÿתÿ4
אמא4
אמת4
אממ4
אמף4
אמו4
אמט4
אמ‏4
אמÿ4
תמא4
תמת4
תממ4
תמף4
תמו4
תמט4
תמ‏4
תמÿ4
ממא4
ממת4
מממ4
ממף4
ממו4
ממט4
ממ‏4
ממÿ4
ףמא4
ףמת4
ףממ4
ףמף4
ףמו4
ףמט4
ףמ‏4
ףמÿ4
ומא4
ומת4
וממ4
ומף4
ומו4
ומט4
ומ‏4
ומÿ4
טמא4
טמת4
טממ4
טמף4
טמו4
טמט4
טמ‏4
טמÿ4
‏מא4
‏מת4
‏ממ4
‏מף4
‏מו4
‏מט4
‏מ‏4
‏מÿ4
ÿמא4
ÿמת4
ÿממ4
ÿמף4
ÿמו4
ÿמט4
ÿמ‏4
ÿמÿ4
אףא4
אףת4
אףמ4
אףף4
אףו4
אףט4
אף‏4
אףÿ4
תףא4
תףת4
תףמ4
תףף4
תףו4
תףט4
תף‏4
תףÿ4
מףא4
מףת4
מףמ4
מףף4
מףו4
מףט4
מף‏4
מףÿ4
ףףא4
ףףת4
ףףמ4
ףףף4
ףףו4
ףףט4
ףף‏4
ףףÿ4
וףא4
וףת4
וףמ4
